Nebraska, session 109, LB1130.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 59 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Community Improvement District Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Community Improvement District Act:
(1) Administrator means the person appointed by the Auditor of
Public Accounts pursuant to section 42 of this act to manage the affairs
of a community improvement district and to exercise the powers of the
board of trustees during the period of the appointment to the extent
prescribed in the Community Improvement District Act;
(2) Bond means an investment security under article 8, Uniform
Commercial Code, in the form of a long-term, written promise to pay a
specified sum of money, referred to as the face value or principal
amount, at a specified maturity date or dates in the future, plus
periodic interest at a specified rate;
(3) Capital outlay means expenditures for construction or
reconstruction of major permanent facilities having an expected long
life, including, but not limited to, public infrastructure improvements;
(4) Development means the original installation of any public
improvements to the standards of the city or village zoning standards;
(5) Operation and maintenance expenses means and includes, but is
not limited to, salaries, cost of materials and supplies for operation
and maintenance of the community improvement district's facilities, cost
of ordinary repairs, replacements, and alterations, cost of surety bonds
and insurance, cost of audits and other fees, and taxes;
(6) Public infrastructure means any publicly owned electric service
lines and conduits, gas service lines and conduits, sanitary sewer lines,
sanitary sewer system improvements, storm sewer lines, storm sewer system
improvements, flood control improvements, water lines, water system
improvements, emergency management warning system improvements,
sidewalks, roads, streets, highways, pedestrian walkways, public spaces,
public facilities, parks, playgrounds, recreational facilities, offstreet
motor vehicle parking facilities, public waterways, docks, wharfs, rail
-2-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
lines, flood control systems, flood control improvements, and related
appurtenances, whether owned or to be owned by the community improvement
district or another political subdivision;
(7) Public waterways means artificially created boat channels
dedicated to public use and providing access to navigable rivers or
streams;
(8) Redevelopment means the reconstruction, rehabilitation, or
original installation of public infrastructure as long as prior public
infrastructure has been installed in the community improvement district
even if such installation occurred prior to the formation of the
community improvement district; and
(9) Warrant means an investment security under article 8, Uniform
Commercial Code, in the form of a short-term, interest-bearing order
payable on a specified date issued by the board of trustees or
administrator of a community improvement district to be paid from funds
available or expected to be received in the future, and includes, but is
not limited to, property tax collections, special assessment collections,
and proceeds of sale of bonds.
Sec. 3. (1)(a) A majority of the owners, as determined in
subsection (5) of this section, having an interest in the real property
within the limits of a proposed community improvement district, situated
wholly within a village or city in this state at the time of approval
pursuant to section 6 of this act, may propose formation of a community
improvement district for the purpose of construction, installation,
improvement, equipping, maintenance, and repair of public infrastructure
in or related to such community improvement district, and contracting
with the city or village in which the community improvement district is
located or other political subdivisions of this state for any public
purpose. The real property included within a community improvement
district may be contiguous or noncontiguous.
(b) Nothing in this section shall authorize community improvement
-3-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
districts to purchase electric service and resell the same.
(c) For the purposes listed in this section, such majority of the
owners may make and sign articles of association in which shall be stated
(i) the name of the community improvement district, (ii) that the
community improvement district will have perpetual existence, (iii) the
limits of the community improvement district, (iv) the name and place of
residence of each owner of the land in the proposed community improvement
district, (v) the description of the several tracts of land situated in
the community improvement district owned by those who may organize the
community improvement district, and (vi) the name and the description of
the real estate owned by any such owner who does not join in the
organization of the community improvement district but who will be
benefited thereby. Such owners of real estate as are unknown may also be
set out in the articles as such.
(d) No community improvement district may own or hold land in excess
of ten acres, unless such land so owned and held by such community
improvement district is actually used for a public purpose, as provided
in this section, within three years after its acquisition. Any community
improvement district which has acquired land in excess of ten acres in
area and has not devoted the same to a public purpose, as set forth in
this section, within three years after the date of its acquisition, shall
devote the same to a use set forth in this section or shall divest itself
of such land. When a community improvement district divests itself of
land pursuant to this section, it shall do so by sale at public auction
to the highest bidder after notice of such sale has been given by
publication at least three times for three consecutive weeks prior to the
date of sale in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the area
of the community improvement district.
(2) The articles of association shall state:
(a) The proposed community improvement district proposes an
aggregate maximum permitted levy rate for all purposes in an amount not
-4-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
to exceed ......... per $100 of taxable valuation in such community
improvement district, to be deposited and held in the funds of the
community improvement district and used for general corporate purposes,
including payment of principal of and interest on any outstanding bonds,
warrants, and other obligations of the community improvement district;
and
(b) The owners of real estate so forming the community improvement
district for such purposes are willing and obligate themselves to pay the
tax or taxes which may be levied against all the property in the
community improvement district and special assessments against the real
property benefited which may be assessed against them to pay the expenses
that may be necessary for the purposes of the community improvement
district as authorized in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The articles shall propose the names of five or more trustees
who (a) live in the purposed community improvement district, (b) are
owners of real estate located in the proposed community improvement
district, or (c) are designees of the owners if the real estate is owned
by a limited partnership, a general partnership, a limited liability
company, a public, private, or municipal corporation, an estate, or a
trust. The five trustees approved pursuant to section 6 of this act shall
serve as a board of trustees until their successors are elected and
qualified if such community improvement district is organized.
(4) After the articles are signed, the same shall be filed in the
office of the clerk of the city or village in which such community
improvement district shall be located together with a request that the
city council of the city or board of trustees of the village in which
such articles of association have been filed pass and approve an
ordinance approving formation of such community improvement district
pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act.
(5) For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, a majority of
the owners having an interest in the real property in a proposed
-5-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
community improvement district is determined as follows:
(a) If the real property in a proposed community improvement
district is currently zoned commercial or industrial, a majority of the
owners is determined based on the number of acres owned in the proposed
boundary of the community improvement district;
(b) If the real property in a proposed community improvement
district is currently zoned residential, a majority of the owners is
determined based on the majority of the number of residential lots or
condominium units in the proposed boundary of the community improvement
district, regardless of lot size;
(c) If the real property in a proposed community improvement
district is currently zoned agricultural, majority means all real
property owners; and
(d) If the real property in a proposed community improvement
district is a combination of subdivisions (a) through (c) of this
subsection, a majority of the owners is determined giving equal weight to
each acre and each residential lot and must include all owners of
agricultural land in the proposed boundary of the community improvement
district.
Sec. 4. (1) Immediately after the articles of association and
request for approval have been filed, as provided for by subsection (4)
of section 3 of this act, the clerk of the city or village where the
articles are filed shall schedule a hearing to be held within ninety days
after the date of such filing by the city council or village board of
trustees regarding formation of the proposed community improvement
district and any objections to such formation.
(2) The city or village clerk shall publish a notice of association
in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or village and in the
proposed community improvement district in one publication at least sixty
days prior to the date of such hearing and in the four weekly
publications of such newspaper immediately preceding the date set for
-6-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
such hearing, which notice shall set forth the following:
(a) That the articles of association have been filed in the office
of the city or village clerk and are available for inspection and the
purpose thereof;
(b) The date and time of the hearing scheduled regarding formation
of the proposed community improvement district and any objections thereto
and that any written objections regarding such community improvement
district shall be filed with the city or village clerk at least seven
calendar days prior to the date of such hearing;
(c) A description of the real estate proposed to be included in the
community improvement district and that the owner or owners of such real
estate will be affected by formation of such community improvement
district and rendered liable to taxation and special assessment in
accordance with law and in addition to any other taxes or assessments of
the city or village and other existing taxing entities, for the purpose
of construction, installation, improvement, equipping, maintenance, and
repair of public infrastructure in or related to such community
improvement district, and contracting with the city or village in which
the community improvement district is located or other political
subdivisions of this state for any public purpose;
(d) The names of the proposed trustees;
(e) The proposed aggregate maximum permitted levy rate for all
purposes, stated as an amount not to exceed ......... per $100 of taxable
valuation in such community improvement district, to be deposited and
held in the funds of the community improvement district and used for
general corporate purposes, including payment of principal of and
interest on any outstanding bonds, warrants, and other obligations of the
community improvement district; and
(f) That application has been made to the city or village to declare
to the district a community improvement district pursuant to the
Community Improvement District Act.
-7-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
(3) The city or village clerk shall mail a copy of such notice of
association to the several owners of real estate in the proposed
community improvement district who have not signed the articles of
association. The notice shall be sent via certified mail service to the
last-known address of each such owner no later than ten days after
publishing the first notice of association, with a return receipt
requested showing to whom and where the notice was delivered and the date
of delivery.
Sec. 5. Any owner of real estate situated in the proposed community
improvement district who has not signed the articles of association and
who may object to the organization of the community improvement district
or to any one or more of the proposed trustees shall, at least seven
calendar days prior to the date of the hearing scheduled pursuant to
subsection (1) of section 4 of this act, file any such objection in
writing with the city or village clerk where the articles were filed,
stating (1) why such community improvement district should not be
organized and declared a public corporation in this state, (2) why the
owner's real estate should not be embraced in the limits of such
community improvement district, and (3) any objections to the proposed
trustees.
Sec. 6. (1) The hearing with respect to such application and any
objections scheduled pursuant to subsection (1) of section 4 of this act
shall be held by the city council or village board of trustees on the
date and time provided in the notice of association. At the conclusion of
such hearing, subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
city council or village board of trustees may pass an ordinance which (a)
specifies the property included in the community improvement district,
(b) names five trustees as the board of trustees of such community
improvement district to serve until their successors are elected and
qualified pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act, (c)
specifies the maximum levy rate for all purposes stated as an amount not
-8-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
to exceed ......... per $100 of taxable valuation in such community
improvement district, to be deposited and held in the funds of the
community improvement district and used for general corporate purposes,
including payment of principal of and interest on any outstanding bonds,
warrants, and other obligations of the community improvement district,
and (d) declares the community improvement district a duly formed
political subdivision and community improvement district pursuant to the
Community Improvement District Act. Such ordinance shall not be passed
unless and until all property included in such proposed community
improvement district is within the corporate limits of the city or
village.
(2) If any objection to the formation of such community improvement
district is filed by a property owner within the community improvement
district who did not sign the articles of association, the application
shall not be approved by the city council or village board of trustees
unless (a) the boundaries are amended to remove the property owned by
such objecting property owner or (b) the city council or village board of
trustees determines that inclusion of such property within the community
improvement district (i) is necessary to the public health or welfare of
the community improvement district and the city or village, or (ii) is
appropriate because such property will be specially benefitted by public
infrastructure improvements expected to be made by the community
improvement district.
(3) In case of objection to any of the nominated trustees, the city
council or village board of trustees may identify and name other suitable
trustees to serve on the board of trustees of such community improvement
district who shall be (a) owners of real estate located in the community
improvement district or (b) designated to serve as representatives on the
board of trustees if the real estate is owned by a limited partnership, a
general partnership, a limited liability company, a public, private, or
municipal corporation, an estate, or a trust.
-9-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
Sec. 7. A community improvement district shall be a body corporate
and politic by the name of Community Improvement District
Number ........... of the (city or village) of ........... and shall have
the power and authority to take and hold real and personal property
necessary for its use, to levy property taxes, to make contracts, to sue
and be sued, and to exercise any and all other powers, as a corporation,
necessary to carry out the purposes of the Community Improvement District
Act.
Sec. 8. Within forty-five days after a community improvement
district has been declared a public corporation by the city council or
village board of trustees, the clerk of the community improvement
district shall transmit to the Secretary of State a certified copy of the
record relating thereto, including a copy of the articles of association,
and the same shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State in
the same manner as articles of incorporation are required to be filed
under the general law concerning corporations. A copy of such record,
including a copy of the articles of association and a plat of the
community improvement district, shall also be filed in the office of the
county clerk of the county in which the community improvement district,
or any part thereof, is situated.
Sec. 9. (1) Within thirty days after the city council or village
board of trustees has declared a community improvement district to be a
public corporation, the trustees appointed upon formation shall meet and
elect one of their number chairperson and one of their number clerk of
the community improvement district.
(2) Except as otherwise provided, the board of trustees shall:
(a) Keep a record of all of its proceedings which shall be open to
inspection by all owners of real estate in the community improvement
district;
(b) Have the power to pass all necessary resolutions, orders, rules,
and regulations for the necessary conduct of its business and to carry
-10-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
into effect the objects for which the community improvement district was
formed; and
(c) Have the authority to appoint, employ, and pay accountants,
attorneys, engineers, municipal advisors, underwriters, and such other
professional or clerical help as may be needed, who shall each be
removable at the pleasure of the board or administrator.
(3) Upon the appointment of an administrator for the community
improvement district pursuant to sections 42 to 51 of this act, the
authority of the trustees to exercise the powers granted in this section
shall be suspended, except that the board shall continue in existence and
the administrator shall periodically, but not less frequently than
monthly, report to the board in writing on all decisions and actions
taken by the administrator in managing the affairs of the community
improvement district. The administrator shall, during the period of his
or her appointment, possess exclusive authority to exercise the powers
and duties conferred in the Community Improvement District Act.
Sec. 10. Within thirty days after the creation of a community
improvement district, the clerk of the community improvement district
shall file with the register of deeds, county clerk, and election
commissioner, of each county or counties in which the community
improvement district is located, a statement containing the following
information: (1) The community improvement district number; (2) the outer
boundaries of the community improvement district; (3) that the community
improvement district has the power to levy a property tax and indicate
the rate approved pursuant to section 6 of this act to pay its debt and
its expenses of operation and maintenance; (4) that the community
improvement district may levy special assessments on property in the
community improvement district to the full extent of special benefits
arising by reason of development improvements installed by the community
improvement district; (5) that the annual budget of the community
improvement district is filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts, which
-11-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
budget shows the anticipated revenue and expenses, tax levy, and
indebtedness of the community improvement district; (6) that the actual
current tax levy amount of the community improvement district may be
obtained from each county in which the community improvement district is
located; and (7) that a copy of the annual financial audit of the
community improvement district is on file with the clerk of the community
improvement district and the Auditor of Public Accounts. Such statement
shall be supplemented and refiled to indicate any land added to or
removed from the community improvement district after the original
filing.
Sec. 11. The chairperson and clerk or administrator of any
community improvement district shall, upon assuming his or her respective
office, execute and file with the city or village clerk of the city or
village in which such community improvement district is located, a bond,
with one or more sureties, to be approved by the city or village clerk,
running to the State of Nebraska in the penal sum of five thousand
dollars for the chairperson, twenty thousand dollars for the clerk, and
twenty thousand dollars for the administrator, conditioned for the
faithful performance of their official duties and the faithful accounting
by them for all funds and property of the community improvement district
that shall come into their possession or control during their term of
office. The premium, if any, on any such bond shall be paid out of the
funds of the community improvement district. Suit may be brought on such
bonds by any person, firm, or corporation that has sustained loss or
damage in consequence of the breach thereof.
Sec. 12. (1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section
84-1411, the clerk or administrator of each community improvement
district shall notify the city or village where such district is located
of all meetings of the community improvement district board of trustees
or called by the administrator by sending a notice of such meeting to the
clerk of the city or village not less than seven days prior to the date
-12-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
set for any meeting. In the case of meetings called by the administrator,
notice shall be provided to the clerk of the community improvement
district not less than seven days prior to the date set for any meeting.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1411, within
the timeframe required by subsection (3) of section 84-1413, after any
meeting of a community improvement district board of trustees or called
by the administrator, the clerk or administrator of the community
improvement district shall transmit to the city or village where the
community improvement district is located a copy of the minutes of such
meeting.
Sec. 13. (1)(a) On or before December 31 of each year, the clerk of
each community improvement district shall file with the register of deeds
or the clerk of the city or village in which the community improvement
district is located a statement updated each December 31 containing the
following information:
(i) The names of the members of the current board of trustees of the
community improvement district;
(ii) The names of the following if applicable: Current attorney,
accountant, engineer, underwriter, and municipal advisor of the community
improvement district;
(iii) The warrant and the bond principal indebtedness of the
community improvement district as of the preceding June 30. Such
statement shall contain an acknowledgment that the warrant and
indebtedness are reflective of such date; and
(iv) The current tax levy of the community improvement district, as
described in section 21 of this act, as of December 31.
(b) For any late filing of the statement, the community improvement
district shall be assessed a late fee of ten dollars per day by the
register of deeds or the clerk of the city or village, not to exceed a
total of three hundred dollars for each late filing.
(2) The real estate broker or salesperson or, if none, the owner of
-13-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
the real estate shall distribute the most recent statement filed in
accordance with this section to any prospective purchaser of any real
estate located within a community improvement district.
(3) The real estate broker or salesperson or, if none, the owner
shall obtain an acknowledgment from any purchaser of any real estate
located within a community improvement district that the purchaser
understands the property is located within a community improvement
district. Such acknowledgment may be obtained separately from the
disclosure required under section 76-2,120.
(4) The statement shall be distributed and the acknowledgment
obtained on or before the date on which the purchaser becomes obligated
to purchase such real estate. The exclusive remedy for failure to provide
such statements and obtain such acknowledgments shall be an action for
damages, and any such failure shall not affect title to the real estate
or the validity of the conveyance.
Sec. 14. (1)(a) On the first Tuesday after the second Monday in
September which is at least fifteen months after the city council or
village board of trustees passes the ordinance creating a community
improvement district and on the first Tuesday after the second Monday in
September each two years thereafter, the board of trustees shall cause a
special election to be held, at which election a board of trustees shall
be elected. The board of trustees shall have five members except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section. Each member elected to the
board of trustees shall be elected to a term of two years and shall hold
office until such member's successor is elected and qualified. Any person
desiring to file for the office of trustee may file for such office with
the election commissioner or county clerk of the county in which the
greater proportion in area of the community improvement district is
located not later than fifty days before the election. If such person
will serve on the board of trustees as a designated representative of a
limited partnership, general partnership, limited liability company,
-14-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
public, private, or municipal corporation, estate, or trust which owns
real estate in the community improvement district, the filing shall
indicate that fact and shall include appropriate documentation evidencing
such fact. No filing fee shall be required. A person filing for the
office of trustee to be elected at the election held six years after the
first election of trustees and each election thereafter shall designate
whether such person is a candidate for election by the resident owners of
such community improvement district or a candidate for election by all of
the owners of real estate located in the community improvement district.
If a person filing for the office of trustee is a designated
representative of a limited partnership, a general partnership, a limited
liability company, a public, private, or municipal corporation, an
estate, or a trust which owns real estate in the community improvement
district, the name of such entity shall accompany the name of the
candidate on the ballot in the following form: (Name of candidate) to
represent (name of entity) as a member of the board. The name of each
candidate shall appear on only one ballot.
(b) The name of a person may be written in and voted for as a
candidate for the office of trustee, and such write-in candidate may be
elected to the office of trustee. A write-in candidate for the office of
trustee who will serve as a designated representative of a limited
partnership, a general partnership, a limited liability company, a
public, private, or municipal corporation, an estate, or a trust which
owns real estate in the community improvement district shall not be
elected to the office of trustee unless (i) each vote is accompanied by
the name of the entity which the candidate will represent and (ii) within
ten days after the date of the election the candidate provides the
election commissioner or county clerk with appropriate documentation
evidencing the candidate's representation of the entity. Votes cast which
do not carry such accompanying designation shall not be counted.
(c) A trustee shall be an owner of real estate located in the
-15-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
community improvement district or shall be a person designated to serve
as a representative on the board of trustees if the real estate is owned
by a limited partnership, a general partnership, a limited liability
company, a public, private, or municipal corporation, an estate, or a
trust. Notice of the date of the election shall be mailed by the clerk of
the community improvement district not later than sixty-five days prior
to the election to each person who is entitled to vote at the election
for trustees whose property ownership or lease giving a right to vote is
of record on the records of the register of deeds as of a date designated
by the election commissioner or county clerk, which date shall be not
more than eighty days prior to the election.
(2)(a) For any community improvement district, a person whose
ownership or right to vote becomes of record or is received after the
date specified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may vote when
such person establishes the right to vote to the satisfaction of the
election board appointed pursuant to section 15 of this act. At the first
election and at the election held two years after the first election, any
person may cast one vote for each trustee for each acre of unplatted land
or fraction thereof and one vote for each platted lot which such person
may own in the community improvement district.
(b) This subdivision applies to a community improvement district
until the board of trustees amends its articles of association pursuant
to subdivision (2)(d) of this section. At the election held six years
after the first election of trustees, two members of the board of
trustees shall be elected by the legal property owners resident within
such community improvement district and three members shall be elected by
all of the owners of real estate located in the community improvement
district pursuant to this section. Every resident property owner may cast
one vote for a candidate for each office of trustee to be filled by
election of resident property owners only. Such resident property owners
may also each cast one vote for each acre of unplatted land or fraction
-16-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
thereof and for each platted lot owned within the community improvement
district for a candidate for each office of trustee to be filled by
election of all property owners. For each office of trustee to be filled
by election of all property owners of the community improvement district,
every legal property owner not resident within such community improvement
district may cast one vote for each acre of unplatted land or fraction
thereof and one vote for each platted lot which such legal property owner
owns in the community improvement district. At the election held eight
years after the first election of trustees and at each election
thereafter, three members of the board of trustees shall be elected by
the legal property owners resident within such community improvement
district and two members shall be elected by all of the owners of real
estate located in the community improvement district pursuant to this
section. If there are not any legal property owners resident within such
community improvement district or if not less than ninety percent of the
area of the community improvement district is owned for other than
residential uses, the five members shall be elected by the legal property
owners of all property within such community improvement district as
provided in this section.
(c) Any public, private, or municipal corporation owning any land or
lot in the community improvement district may vote at an election the
same as an individual. If more than fifty percent of the homes in any
community improvement district are used as a second, seasonal, or
recreational residence, the owners of such property shall be considered
legal property owners resident within such community improvement district
for purposes of electing trustees. For purposes of voting for trustees,
each condominium apartment under a condominium property regime
established under the Nebraska Condominium Act shall be deemed to be a
platted lot and the lessee or the owner of the lessee's interest, under
any lease for an initial term of not less than twenty years which
requires the lessee to pay taxes and special assessments levied on the
-17-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
leased property, shall be deemed to be the owner of the property so
leased and entitled to cast the vote of such property. When ownership of
a platted lot or unplatted land is held jointly by two or more persons,
whether as joint tenants, tenants in common, limited partners, members of
a limited liability company, or any other form of joint ownership, only
one person shall be entitled to cast the vote of such property. The
executor, administrator, guardian, or trustee of any person or estate
interested shall have the right to vote. No corporation, estate, or
irrevocable trust shall be deemed to be a resident owner for purposes of
voting for trustees. Should two or more persons or officials claim the
right to vote on the same tract, the election board appointed pursuant to
section 15 of this act shall determine the party entitled to vote.
(d) For any community improvement district which has been in
existence for at least ten years, which has less than seventy property
owners entitled to vote for trustees, which has at least two resident
property owners, and in which less than ten percent of the area of the
community improvement district is owned for other than residential uses,
the board of trustees may amend its articles of association as provided
in section 23 of this act to provide for a reduction in the number of
trustees on the board from five members to three members to be effective
at the beginning of the term of office for the board of trustees elected
at the next election. At the next election and at each election
thereafter, two members of the board of trustees shall be elected by the
legal property owners resident within such community improvement district
and one member shall be elected by all of the owners of real estate
located in the community improvement district pursuant to this section.
Every resident property owner may cast one vote for a candidate for each
office of trustee to be filled by election of resident property owners
only. Such resident property owners may also each cast one vote for each
acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and for each platted lot owned
within the community improvement district for a candidate for the office
-18-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
of trustee to be filled by election of all property owners. For the
office of trustee to be filled by election of all property owners of the
community improvement district, every legal property owner not resident
within such community improvement district may cast one vote for each
acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and one vote for each platted
lot which such legal property owner owns in the community improvement
district.
(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall hold any
election required by subsection (1) of this section by sealed mail ballot
by notifying the board of trustees on or before July 1 of a given year.
The election commissioner or county clerk shall, at least twenty days
prior to the election, mail a ballot and return envelope to each person
who is entitled to vote at the election and whose property ownership or
lease giving a right to vote is of record with the register of deeds as
of the date designated by the election commissioner or county clerk,
which date shall not be more than eighty days prior to the election. The
ballot and return envelope shall include: (a) The names and addresses of
the candidates; (b) room for write-in candidates; and (c) instructions on
how to vote and return the ballot. Such ballots shall be returned in the
return envelope to the election commissioner or county clerk no later
than 5 p.m. on the date set for the election. If the ballot is not
returned in the return envelope, such ballot shall not be counted. If
more than one ballot is included in the same return envelope, such
ballots shall not be counted and shall be reinserted into the return
envelope which shall be resealed and marked rejected.
Sec. 15. (1)(a) At any election held to elect trustees of a
community improvement district, the ballots shall be received, counted,
and canvassed by an election board of two or more persons appointed by
the election commissioner or county clerk.
(b) Such board shall select one of their number as chairperson and
one of their number as clerk. In case of a vacancy on such board, a new
-19-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
member shall be appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(2) For any community improvement district, the election
commissioner or county clerk shall certify the results of the election to
the community improvement district.
(3) If an election is contested involving a community improvement
district board of trustees, the Election Act shall apply.
Sec. 16. Not later than June first of each year, the election
commissioner or county clerk shall determine which community improvement
districts in the county are required to hold elections in such year and
shall so notify the clerk of each such community improvement district on
or before July first of such year. The entire costs of conducting the
election shall be borne by the community improvement district holding the
election, and such costs shall include all expenses such as procuring a
list of the property owners of record in each such community improvement
district, printing and mailing notices of the elections to such property
owners, printing, preparing, and mailing ballots, paying compensation and
mileage for the election boards conducting such elections, and also
indirect expenses, such as the pro rata amount of any additional clerical
expense or other miscellaneous expenses to be incurred by the election
commissioner or county clerk in conducting all of such elections to be
held in such calendar year. Within sixty days after the elections have
been held, each community improvement district shall be charged and
billed for all of the actual expenses incurred by the election
commissioner or county clerk attributable to such community improvement
district. Payment of the total amount billed to the community improvement
district shall be in currency and made by the attorney for the community
improvement district to the election commissioner or county clerk within
sixty days after receipt of such billing.
Sec. 17. Notwithstanding the appointment of an administrator for
any community improvement district pursuant to sections 42 to 51 of this
act, special elections shall be held for the election of members of the
-20-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
board of trustees for such community improvement district in the same
manner and at the same time as such elections would be held under
sections 14 and 15 of this act. In a community improvement district for
which such an administrator has been appointed when the board of trustees
of such community improvement district is not functioning, the
administrator shall cause a special election of trustees to be held
within sixty days after the issuance of a certificate of appointment of
such administrator, at which election a board of trustees shall be
elected to a term of office which shall expire on the first Tuesday of
the second September following the appointment of such administrator. The
board of trustees shall have five members unless the board has amended
its articles of association to decrease the number of trustees on the
board to three members pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of section 14 of
this act.
Sec. 18. A community improvement district may acquire by purchase,
condemnation, or otherwise, real or personal property, right-of-way, and
privilege, within or without its corporate limits, necessary for its
corporate purposes. Such acquisition by the community improvement
district may be effected only after approval by the city or village
having zoning jurisdiction over such property. The approval of plans and
specifications for the public improvement or project, or the approval of
plans and exact costs for public parks, playgrounds, and recreational
facilities, as required by section 22 of this act, shall be deemed to be
approval for the acquisition by the community improvement district of
such fee title, easements, or other interests in such property as may be
required for the public improvement or project.
Sec. 19. Whenever the board of trustees or administrator of any
community improvement district shall by order determine to make any
public improvement under the provisions of the Community Improvement
District Act which shall require that private property be taken or
damaged, the community improvement district may exercise the power of
-21-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
eminent domain. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in
the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724. Such taking by the
community improvement district may be effected only after approval by the
city or village having any zoning jurisdiction over such property.
Sec. 20. Whenever it shall be necessary, in making any improvement
under the provisions of the Community Improvement District Act, to enter
upon or cross any state or public lands, the community improvement
district shall have the right to acquire a right-of-way across the same
by the exercise of the power of eminent domain.
Sec. 21. (1) The community improvement district shall have the
power to annually levy a tax on the taxable value of the taxable property
in the community improvement district at an aggregate rate not to exceed
the levy rate specified in the articles of organization and approved by
ordinance of the city or village pursuant to section 6 of this act, the
proceeds of which shall be deposited to and held in the general fund,
bond fund, or other fund or account established as determined by the
board of trustees of such community improvement district, and used for
payment of bonds and warrants, and other general corporate purposes of
the community improvement district as permitted by the Community
Improvement District Act.
(2) The county treasurer of the county in which the greater portion
of the area of the community improvement district is located shall be ex
officio treasurer of the community improvement district and shall be
responsible for all funds of the community improvement district coming
into his or her hands. As treasurer of the community improvement district
he or she shall (a) establish such funds and accounts on behalf of the
community improvement district as he or she determines necessary or
appropriate at the direction of the board of trustees of the community
improvement district and (b) collect all taxes and special assessments
levied by the community improvement district and deposit the same in the
appropriate funds and accounts of the community improvement district for
-22-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
the payment of principal and interest on any bonds, warrants, and other
obligations outstanding and for general corporate purposes of the
community improvement district, all in accordance with action of the
board of trustees of the community improvement district.
(3) The treasurer of the community improvement district shall not be
responsible for funds of the community improvement district until they
are received by him or her. The treasurer of the community improvement
district shall disburse the funds of the community improvement district
upon the direction of the trustees or the administrator and signed by the
chairperson and clerk of the community improvement district or the
administrator, including issuance of warrants and other action of the
board of trustees.
Sec. 22. (1) The board of trustees or the administrator of any
community improvement district organized under the Community Improvement
District Act shall have power to:
(a) Construct, install, improve, equip, maintain, and repair public
infrastructure in or related to such community improvement district; and
(b) Contract with the city or village or other political subdivision
in which such community improvement district is located for any public
purpose of such community improvement district, city or village, or other
political subdivision.
(2) Prior to the installation of any of the public infrastructure or
entering into a contract for any capital improvement with another
political subdivision, the plans or contracts for such improvements or
services and estimated costs shall be approved by the city or village in
which the community improvement district is located. The community
improvement district shall obtain approval of such plans for such
improvements, and any changes thereto, from the city or village in which
the community improvement district is located, and such city or village
shall enforce compliance with such plans by action in equity.
(3)(a) Each community improvement district shall have the books of
-23-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
account kept by the board of trustees of the community improvement
district examined and audited by a certified public accountant or a
public accountant for the year ending June 30 and shall file a copy of
the audit with the office of the Auditor of Public Accounts by December
31 of the same year. Such audits may be waived by the Auditor of Public
Accounts upon proper showing by the community improvement district that
the audit is unnecessary. Such examination and audit shall show the
following:
(i) The gross income of the community improvement district from all
sources for the previous year;
(ii) The amount expended each year for (A) maintenance and repairs,
(B) new equipment, (C) new construction work, and (D) property purchased;
(iii) A detailed statement of all items of expense;
(iv) The total amount of taxes levied upon the property within the
community improvement district; and
(v) All other facts necessary to give an accurate and comprehensive
view of the cost of carrying on the activities and work of such community
improvement district.
(b) The reports of all audits provided for in this subsection shall
be and remain a part of the public records in the office of the Auditor
of Public Accounts. The expense of such audits shall be paid out of the
funds of the community improvement district. The Auditor of Public
Accounts shall be given access to all books and papers, contracts,
minutes, bonds, and other documents and memoranda of every kind and
character of such community improvement district and be furnished all
additional information possessed by any present or past officer or
employee of any such community improvement district, or by any other
person, that is essential to the making of a comprehensive and correct
audit.
(4) If any community improvement district fails or refuses to cause
such annual audit to be made of all of its functions, activities, and
-24-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
transactions for the fiscal year within a period of six months following
the close of such fiscal year, unless such audit has been waived, the
Auditor of Public Accounts shall, after due notice and a hearing to show
cause by such community improvement district, appoint a certified public
accountant or public accountant to conduct the annual audit of the
community improvement district and the fee for such audit shall become a
lien against the community improvement district.
(5) Whenever the sanitary sewer system or any part thereof of a
community improvement district is directly or indirectly connected to the
sewerage system of any city or village, such city or village, without
enacting an ordinance or adopting any resolution for such purpose, may
collect such city's or village's applicable rental or use charge from the
users in the community improvement district and from the owners of the
property served within the community improvement district. The charges of
such city or village shall be charged to each property served by the city
or village sewerage system, shall be a lien upon the property served, and
may be collected from the owner or the person, firm, or corporation using
the service. If the city's or village's applicable rental or service
charge is not paid when due, such sum may be recovered by the city or
village in a civil action or it may be assessed against the premises
served as a special assessment and may be assessed by such city or
village and collected and returned in the same manner as other municipal
special assessments are enforced and collected. When any such assessment
is levied, it shall be the duty of the city or village clerk to deliver a
certified copy of the ordinance to the county treasurer of the county in
which the premises assessed are located and such county treasurer shall
collect the assessment as provided by law and return the assessment to
the city or village treasurer. Funds of such city or village raised from
such charges shall be used by it in accordance with laws applicable to
its sewer service rental or charges. The governing body of any city or
village may make all necessary rules and regulations governing the direct
-25-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
or indirect use of its sewerage system by any user and premises within
any community improvement district and may establish just and equitable
rates or charges to be paid to such city or village for use of any of its
disposal plants and sewerage system. The board of trustees may, in
connection with the issuance of any warrants or bonds of the community
improvement district, agree to make a specified minimum levy on taxable
property in the community improvement district to pay, or to provide a
sinking fund to pay, principal and interest on warrants and bonds of the
community improvement district for such number of years as the board may
establish at the time of making such agreement and may agree to enforce,
by foreclosure or otherwise as permitted by applicable laws, the
collection of special assessments levied by the community improvement
district. Such agreements may contain provisions granting to creditors
and others the right to enforce and carry out the agreements on behalf of
the community improvement district and its creditors.
(6) The board of trustees or administrator shall have power to sell
and convey real and personal property of the community improvement
district on such terms as it or he or she shall determine, except that
real estate shall be sold to the highest bidder at public auction after
notice of the time and place of the sale has been published for three
consecutive weeks prior to the sale in a newspaper of general circulation
in the city or village. The board of trustees or administrator may reject
such bids and negotiate a sale at a price higher than the highest bid at
the public auction at such terms as may be agreed.
(7) A community improvement district shall be subject to all
regulatory authority, zoning jurisdiction, and other jurisdictional
provision of the city or village in which such community improvement
district is located. Each community improvement district shall have and
the board of trustees may exercise, subject to the regulatory
jurisdiction and permitting authority of such city or village and all
other applicable governing bodies and agencies having authority with
-26-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
respect to any area included in the community improvement district, the
powers relating to public infrastructure and other improvements provided
in this section and authorized by the Community Improvement District Act.
Sec. 23. Whenever a majority of the board of trustees shall deem it
advisable to amend the articles of association of the community
improvement district to change the maximum permitted levy rate, and after
a proposed amendment to the articles of association has been signed by a
majority of the owners having an interest in the real property within the
limits of the community improvement district, the community improvement
district clerk shall file an application for such amendment with the city
or village clerk with a request that the maximum permitted levy rate be
changed, all in the same manner as approval of the initial articles of
association pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act. The city
or village clerk shall process any such request in the same manner as an
initial application for approval of articles of association, shall
schedule a hearing, publish notices, and mail notices to any owner of
property in the community improvement district who did not sign the
proposed amendment, and such city council or village board of trustees
may approve the proposed amendment by ordinance in a similar manner to
the initial articles of association as provided in section 6 of this act.
Sec. 24. All contracts for construction work to be done or
materials or equipment purchased, the expense of which is more than fifty
thousand dollars, shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, upon
notice of not less than twenty days, of the terms and conditions of the
contract to be let. The board of trustees or the administrator shall have
the power to reject any and all bids and readvertise for the letting of
such work or to negotiate any contract after an unsuccessful public
letting.
Sec. 25. (1) Whenever the board of trustees or the administrator
deems it advisable or necessary to build, reconstruct, purchase, or
otherwise acquire public infrastructure improvements or to incur other
-27-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
costs permitted by the Community Improvement District Act, the board of
trustees shall declare the advisability and necessity therefor in a
proposed resolution.
(2) Such proposed resolution of necessity shall refer to the plans
and specifications for the proposed improvements, proposed agreements or
contracts, together with the estimated cost thereof which have been made
and filed with the community improvement district clerk before the
publication of such resolution. The proposed resolution shall state the
amount of such estimated cost.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the board
of trustees or the administrator may assess, to the extent of special
benefits, the cost of such improvements upon properties specially
benefited thereby. The resolution shall state the outer boundaries of the
area within the community improvement district in which it is proposed to
make special assessments.
(4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Community
Improvement District Act, a community improvement district shall not
specially assess the cost of public infrastructure for redevelopment
unless and until such community improvement district has obtained prior
approval by resolution of the city council or village board of trustees.
Sec. 26. (1) Notice of the time and place, which place shall be in
the city or village where the community improvement district is
organized, when any resolution proposed under section 25 of this act
shall be set for consideration before the board of trustees or the
administrator, shall be given the same day each week two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city or
village where the community improvement district was organized, which
publication shall contain the entire wording of the proposed resolution.
The last publication shall not be less than five days nor more than two
weeks prior to the time set for hearing on objections to the adoption of
any such proposed resolution, at which hearing the owners of the property
-28-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
which might become subject to assessment for the contemplated improvement
may appear and make objections to the proposed improvement. Thereupon the
resolution may be amended and adopted or adopted as proposed.
(2) If a petition opposing the proposed resolution, signed by
property owners representing a majority of the front footage which may
become subject to assessment for the cost of any improvements as set
forth by the proposed resolution, is filed with the clerk of the
community improvement district within three days before the date of the
meeting for the hearing on such proposed resolution, such proposed
resolution shall not be adopted.
Sec. 27. Upon compliance with sections 25 and 26 of this act, the
board of trustees or the administrator may by resolution order the
contracting, making, reconstruction, purchase, or otherwise acquiring of
any of the improvements provided for in the Community Improvement
District Act.
Sec. 28. After ordering any such improvements, other than payment
of contracts to other political subdivisions, as provided in the
Community Improvement District Act, the board of trustees or the
administrator may enter into a contract for the construction of such
improvement in one or more contracts, but no work shall be done or
contract let until notice to contractors has been published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation in the city or village where the
community improvement district is organized. The notice shall be
published the same day each week two consecutive weeks in such newspaper
and shall generally state (1) the extent of the work, (2) the kinds of
material to be bid upon, including in such notice all kinds of material
mentioned in the resolution as provided in section 25 of this act, (3)
the amount of the engineer's estimate of the cost of such improvements,
(4) the time when bids will be received, and (5) the amount of the
certified check or bid bond required to accompany the bids. Each bid
shall be accompanied in a separate sealed envelope by a certified check
-29-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
or bid bond in an amount to be named in the notice, which amount shall be
not less than five percent of the engineer's total estimate of the cost,
and shall be made payable to the treasurer of the community improvement
district as security that the bidder to whom the contract may be awarded
will enter into a contract to build the improvements in accordance with
the notice to contractors and give bond in the sum named in such notice
for the construction of such improvements as the notice required. Checks
or bonds accompanying bids not accepted shall be returned to the bidders.
The work provided for in this section shall be done under written
contract with the lowest responsible bidder on the material selected
after the bids are opened and in accordance with the requirements of the
plans and specifications. The board of trustees or the administrator may
reject any or all bids received and advertise for new bids in accordance
with this section.
Sec. 29. If the contractor has furnished the community improvement
district all required records and reports, the community improvement
district shall pay the contractor interest at the rate specified in
section 39-1349, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the
Legislature, on any contract amount retained and the final payment due
the contractor beginning twenty days after completion of the work covered
by the contract under section 28 of this act. The contractor shall notify
the community improvement district in writing that the work has been
completed and the community improvement district, within twenty days
after receipt of such notice, shall give written notice to the contractor
of any objections by the community improvement district to acceptance of
the work.
Sec. 30. (1) After the completion of any work or purchase, the
engineer shall file with the clerk of the community improvement district,
and the clerk of the city or village, a certificate of acceptance. Such
work or purchase shall be considered accepted only after approval by the
city or village, and then by the board of trustees or the administrator
-30-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
by resolution.
(2) Upon approval of the certificate of acceptance, if the board of
trustees determines special assessments are to be levied, the board of
trustees or administrator shall require the engineer to make a complete
statement of all the costs of any such improvements, a plat of the
property in the community improvement district, and a schedule of the
amount proposed to be assessed against each separate piece of property in
such community improvement district. The statement, plat, and schedule
shall be filed with the clerk of the community improvement district
within sixty days after the date of acceptance.
(3) The board of trustees or administrator shall set a time and
place for a hearing on the proposed assessments as provided in subsection
(6) of this section, then order the clerk of the community improvement
district to give notice of such hearing and that such statement, plat,
and schedules are on file in his or her office and that all objections
thereto or to prior proceedings on account of errors, irregularities, or
inequalities not made in writing and filed with the clerk of the
community improvement district within twenty days after the first
publication of such notice shall be deemed to have been waived. Such
notice shall be given by publication the same day each week two
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
city or village where the community improvement district was organized.
Such notice shall state the time and place where any objections, filed as
provided in this section, shall be considered by the board of trustees or
administrator.
(4) The cost of such improvements in the community improvement
district shall be levied as special assessments to the extent of special
benefits to the property. The complete statement of costs and the
schedule of proposed special assessments for such improvements shall be
given to the city or village where such community improvement district is
located within seven days after the first publication of notice of
-31-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
statement, plat, and schedules. The city or village shall have the right
to be heard, and shall have the right of appeal from a final
determination by the board of trustees or administrator against
objections which such city or village has filed.
(5) Notice of the proposed special assessments for such improvements
against each separate piece of property shall be given to each owner of
record thereof within five days after the first publication of notice of
statement, plat, and schedules and, within five days after the first
publication of such notice, a copy thereof, along with statements of
costs and schedules of proposed special assessments, shall be given to
each person or company who, pursuant to written contract with the
community improvement district, has acted as underwriter or municipal
advisor for the community improvement district in connection with the
sale or placement of warrants or bonds issued by the community
improvement district. Each owner shall have the right to be heard and
shall have the right of appeal from the final determination made by the
board of trustees or administrator.
(6) The hearing on the proposed assessment shall be held by the
board of trustees or the administrator sitting as a board of adjustment
and equalization at the time and place specified in such notice and not
less than twenty days nor more than thirty days after the date of the
first publication, unless such session be adjourned, with provisions for
proper notice of such adjournment. At such meeting, the proposed
assessments shall be adjusted and equalized with reference to benefits
resulting from the improvement and shall not exceed such benefits.
Sec. 31. Any person or any city or village aggrieved may appeal to
the district court by filing a petition within twenty days after the
final determination under section 30 of this act. The court shall hear
and determine the appeal in a summary manner as in equity, without a
jury, and shall increase or reduce the special assessments as necessary
to ensure that the special assessments are in the full amount of the
-32-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
special benefits and that the apportionment of benefits is equitable.
Sec. 32. (1) After the equalization of such special assessments as
required by the Community Improvement District Act, such special
assessments shall be levied by the board of trustees or the administrator
upon all lots or parcels of ground within the community improvement
district which are benefited by reason of such improvement, such levy to
be made within six months after acceptance of the improvement by the
board of trustees or the administrator. Failure to levy assessments
within such six-month period shall not invalidate assessments made after
the six-month period. Such special assessments may be relevied, if for
any reason the levy thereof is void or not enforceable. Such levy shall
be enforced as other special assessments and any payments thereof under
previous levies shall be credited to the person or property making the
same. Not less than eleven and not more than twenty days after the
levying of any special assessment, the clerk of the community improvement
district shall certify such levy to the county treasurer and county clerk
of the county.
(2) If a notice of appeal from such levy has been filed with the
clerk of the community improvement district, he or she shall note on the
certificate of levy that an appeal has been commenced and that the
amounts of the assessments are subject to redetermination pursuant to the
appeal. All receipts given by the county treasurer for special
assessments as to which an appeal is pending shall show thereon that the
special assessment amount is subject to redetermination by the appeal.
Upon termination of any appeal, the clerk of the community improvement
district shall so certify to the county clerk and county treasurer. All
assessments made for such purposes shall be collected in the same manner
as general taxes and shall be subject to the same penalties or may be
collected pursuant to section 77-1917.01.
Sec. 33. (1) The board of trustees or the administrator shall not
cause the following property to be assessed for any of the improvements
-33-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
provided for in the Community Improvement District Act: (a) Property by
law not assessable, (b) property not included within the area defined in
the preliminary resolution, and (c) property not benefited.
(2) The exemption in subsection (1) of this section does not apply
if the exempt property has been specially benefited by the improvements.
In such cases, the owner of such property shall pay the community
improvement district a sum equivalent to the amount the property has been
specially benefited, which amount may be recovered by the community
improvement district in an action against the property owner. If the
parties do not agree as to the amount of the special benefits, the amount
may be determined by the district court in an action brought by the
community improvement district for such purpose.
(3) The board of trustees or the administrator may find that any
part or all of such improvements made are of general benefit to the
community improvement district, and the board or administrator may levy
special assessments on all lots, parcels, or pieces of real estate
specially benefited to the extent of the special benefits to such
property. The cost of such improvements shall be paid from the
assessments levied against all the property in the community improvement
district, in the manner provided by section 36 of this act, or may be
paid from unappropriated money in its general fund. The cost of the
improvements shall draw interest at the rate of six percent per annum
from the date of acceptance thereof by the board or administrator until
warrants are issued for, or payment is otherwise provided, in payment of
the contract price.
Sec. 34. All special assessments provided for in section 32 of this
act shall become due in fifty days after the date of the levy and may be
paid within that time without interest, but if not so paid they shall
bear interest thereafter on a per annum basis until delinquent at the
greater of (1) the rate of interest accruing on warrants registered
against such community improvement district sixty days prior to the
-34-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
actual levy of the special assessments or (2) the average rate of
interest accruing on the warrants issued to pay for the improvements for
which the special assessments are to be levied adjusted to the next
greater one-half percent. Such assessments shall become delinquent in
equal annual installments over such periods of years, not exceeding
twenty, as the board of trustees or the administrator may determine at
the time of making the levy. Delinquent installments shall bear interest
at the rate of two percent per annum above the rate set by the community
improvement district on such installments before delinquency, except that
no such rate shall exceed the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as
such rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature. If three
or more installments shall be delinquent, the board of trustees or the
administrator may declare all of the remaining installments to be at once
delinquent and such installments declared delinquent shall bear interest
at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, as such rate may from time to
time be adjusted by the Legislature, until paid and may be collected the
same as other delinquent installments may be collected.
Sec. 35. All special assessments provided by the Community
Improvement District Act and all connection charges collected shall, when
levied, constitute a sinking fund for the purpose of paying the cost of
the improvements provided for in the Community Improvement District Act
with allowable interest thereon and shall be solely and strictly applied
to such purpose to the extent required. Any excess thereof may be by the
board or the administrator, after fully discharging the purposes for
which levied, transferred to such other fund or funds as the board of
trustees or the administrator may deem advisable.
Sec. 36. (1) For the purpose of paying the cost of public
infrastructure improvements and other corporate purposes as provided for
in the Community Improvement District Act, the board of trustees or the
administrator shall have the power to issue negotiable bonds of any such
community improvement district, to be called community improvement
-35-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
district bonds, payable in not to exceed thirty years, and payable from
the maximum levy approved in the articles of association of the community
improvement district and other available funds. Each issue of bonds shall
mature or be subject to mandatory redemption so that the first principal
repayment is made not more than five years after the date of issuance and
so that at least twenty percent of the community improvement district's
bonds then outstanding shall be repaid within ten years after the date of
issuance. Such bonds shall bear interest payable annually or
semiannually. Such bonds may either be sold by the community improvement
district or delivered to the contractor in payment for the work but in
either case for not less than their par value. For the purpose of making
partial payments as the work progresses, warrants may be issued by the
board of trustees or the administrator upon certificates of the engineer
in charge showing the amount of work completed and materials necessarily
purchased and delivered for the orderly and proper continuation of the
project, in a sum not to exceed ninety-five percent of the cost thereof.
(2)(a) Warrants issued for capital outlays of the community
improvement district shall become due and payable not later than five
years from the date of issuance, except that such warrants need not be
retired on such date or within such five-year period and shall not be in
default if the district court of the county determines, upon application
by the community improvement district, that the community improvement
district does not have the funds to retire such warrants and either (i)
the community improvement district is unable to sell its bonds in an
amount sufficient to retire such warrants or (ii) an unreasonably high
tax levy, as compared to the levy on other similar property in the county
that is also located within a community improvement district, would be
required in order to cover the debt service requirements on bonds issued
to retire such warrants. Warrants issued to pay interest on capital
outlay warrants shall become due and payable in the same time as capital
outlay warrants.
-36-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
(b) The community improvement district may file the application with
the district court either before or within ninety days after the due date
of the warrants, and no warrant for which an extension application has
been made to the district court and a hearing date set by the court shall
be in default while such application is pending before the court. Notice
of the filing of such application and the time and place of the hearing
thereon shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the
city or village the same day each week for three consecutive weeks.
Within five days after the first publication of such notice, the
community improvement district shall cause to be mailed, by United States
certified mail, a copy of such notice to each holder of warrants covered
by the application whose name and post office address are known to the
community improvement district. Prior to the hearing, proof of such
mailing shall be made by affidavit of a trustee of the community
improvement district, the administrator, or the community improvement
district's attorney that such mailing was made and further that the
community improvement district, its trustees or administrator, and its
attorney, after diligent investigation and inquiry, were unable to
ascertain and do not know the name and post office address of any holder
of such warrants other than those to whom notice has been mailed in
writing or who have waived notice in writing or entered an appearance in
the proceeding.
(c) Upon making its determination, the district court may make such
orders concerning retirement of the warrants as it determines proper
under the circumstances of the community improvement district, including
ordering an increase in the tax levy of the community improvement
district to provide funds for warrant redemption, except that no court-
ordered tax levy for redemption of warrants shall cause the total tax
levy of the community improvement district to be unreasonably high as
compared with the tax levy of other similar property in the county that
is also located within a community improvement district. Such warrants
-37-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
shall draw interest, at such rate as fixed by the board of trustees or
the administrator and endorsed on the warrants, from the date of
presentation for payment and shall be redeemed and paid from the proceeds
of special assessments or from the sale of the bonds issued and sold as
provided in this section or from any other funds available for that
purpose. Bonds to redeem such warrants shall be issued as soon as
economically feasible, and to the extent warrants are not redeemed from
bond proceeds or other funds available for such purpose, the community
improvement district shall make a tax levy to provide a sinking fund for
warrant redemption, except that such obligation shall not require a total
tax levy by the community improvement district which shall be
unreasonably high as compared with the tax levy on other similar property
in the county that is also located within a community improvement
district. The board of trustees or the administrator shall pay to the
contractor interest at the rate specified in section 39-1349, as such
rate may from time to time be adjusted by the Legislature, on the amounts
due on partial and final payments, beginning thirty days after the
certification of the amounts due by the engineer in charge and approval
by the board of trustees or the administrator and running until the date
that the warrant is tendered to the contractor.
(d) A default on the bonds or warrants of a community improvement
district shall not constitute a debt or obligation of the city or village
where such community improvement district is located, the county, or the
state.
(3) Warrants issued for operation and maintenance expenses of the
community improvement district shall be issued not later than sixty days
following the date upon which the community improvement district is in
receipt of a bill for the amount of operation or maintenance expenses
owed, and such warrants shall become due and payable not later than three
years from the date of issuance. If a warrant for operation or
maintenance expenses is not issued within such sixty-day period, the
-38-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
amount owed by the community improvement district shall bear interest
from the sixty-first day until the date upon which the warrant is issued
at a rate equivalent to one and one-half times the rate specified in
subsection (2) of section 45-104.02. The community improvement district
shall agree to pay annual or semiannual interest on all capital outlay
warrants issued by the community improvement district and shall issue
warrants to pay such interest or shall issue its warrants in return for
cash to pay such interest. Warrant interest not paid when due for lack of
funds shall be registered, bear interest, and be paid the same as is
provided in section 10-209 for bond coupons.
(4) The community improvement district may, if determined
appropriate by the board of trustees or the administrator, pay fees to
attorneys, municipal advisors, underwriters, and other professionals in
connection with the placement and registration of ownership of warrants
issued by the community improvement district.
(5) The board of trustees or the administrator may levy special
assessments on all lots, parcels, or pieces of real estate benefited by
the improvement to the extent of the benefits to such property. The
special assessments when collected shall be set aside and constitute a
sinking fund for the payment of the interest and principal of such bonds,
warrants, and other obligations of the community improvement district.
(6) In addition to the special assessments provided for in this
section, there shall be levied annually a tax upon the taxable value of
all the taxable property in such community improvement district which,
together with such sinking fund derived from special assessments, shall
be sufficient to meet payments of interest and principal on all bonds as
such become due, subject to the overall limit on the tax levy rate of
such community improvement district established upon formation of such
community improvement district. Such tax levy shall be known as the
community improvement district bond tax levy and shall be paid annually.
(7)(a) The board of trustees of any community improvement district
-39-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
may provide for the publication of any resolution or other proceeding
adopted by it pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act in a
newspaper of general circulation published in the city or village where
the community improvement district is located. In the case of a
resolution or other proceeding providing for the issuance of bonds,
warrants, or other obligations, pursuant to the Community Improvement
District Act, the board of trustees or clerk of such community
improvement district may, either before or after the adoption of such
resolution or resolutions or other proceeding, in lieu of publishing the
entire resolution or resolutions or other proceeding, publish a notice of
intention to issue bonds, warrants, or other obligations under the
Community Improvement District Act, titled to indicate such intention,
containing:
(i) The name of the community improvement district;
(ii) The estimated principal amount of bonds, warrants, or other
obligations proposed to be issued and the timeframe when such issuance or
issuances are expected to occur;
(iii) The proposed or estimated principal maturity schedule or term
for such bonds, warrants, or other obligations;
(iv) The maximum rate of interest payable on any maturity of such
bonds, warrants, or other obligations; and
(v) The times and place where a copy of the form of resolution or
other proceeding providing for the issuance of the bonds, warrants, or
other obligations may be examined, which shall be located in the city or
village where the community improvement district is located or in the
office of the county clerk in the county where such community improvement
district is located, for a period of at least thirty days after the
publication of such notice. In the case of a notice regarding issuance of
warrants, the notice may include warrants expected to be approved by
multiple future resolutions or other proceedings and the form of
resolution or other proceedings may be general forms for such issuance.
-40-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
(b) For a period of thirty days after such publication, any
interested person shall have the right to contest (i) the legality and
validity of each and all of the proceedings for the organization of such
community improvement district under the Community Improvement District
Act, from and including the petition for the organization of the
community improvement district, and all other proceedings which may
affect the legality or validity of the bonds, warrants, or other
obligations and the order of the sale and the sale thereof, (ii) any
provisions made for the security and payment of such bonds, warrants, or
other obligations, or (iii) any contract of purchase, sale, or lease
relating to the issuance of such bonds, warrants, or other obligations.
After such time no one shall have any cause of action to contest the
regularity, formality, or legality thereof for any cause whatsoever.
Sec. 37. (1) The community improvement district may be enlarged and
additional territory annexed to the community improvement district.
Initiation of any such enlargement shall be by petition filed with the
clerk of the community improvement district, signed by persons owning not
less than fifty percent of the area to be annexed. Upon approval by the
board of trustees of such community improvement district, the clerk of
the community improvement district shall file (a) an application for such
annexation with the city or village clerk with a request that the
annexation be approved, all in the same manner as approval of the initial
articles of association of such community improvement district pursuant
to the Community Improvement District Act and (b) notify the county
clerk, election commissioner, and register of deeds of each county or
counties in which the community improvement district is located of the
proposed annexation. The city or village clerk shall process any such
application in the same manner as an initial application for approval of
the articles of association for such community improvement district and
shall schedule a hearing, publish notices, and mail notices to any owner
of property in the area proposed to be annexed who did not sign the
-41-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
petition for annexation. The city council or village board of trustees
may approve the proposed amendment by ordinance in a similar manner to
the initial articles of association as provided in the Community
Improvement District Act.
(2) All property, from and after annexation to the community
improvement district as provided in subsection (1) of this section, shall
be subject to all taxes and other burdens thereafter levied by the
community improvement district, regardless of when the obligation for
which the taxes or assessments are levied was incurred.
Sec. 38. (1) Whenever a majority of the board of trustees or the
administrator of any community improvement district organized under the
Community Improvement District Act desires that the community improvement
district shall be wholly dissolved, the trustees or administrator shall
first propose a resolution declaring the advisability of such dissolution
and setting out verbatim the terms and conditions thereof, and also
setting out the time and place when the board of trustees or
administrator shall meet to consider the adoption of such resolution.
Notice of the time and place when the resolution shall be set for
consideration shall be delivered to the city or village clerk and the
county clerk, election commissioner, and register of deeds of each county
or counties in which the community improvement district is located at
least forty-five days prior to such date. Notice of the time and place
when the resolution shall be set for consideration shall be published the
same day each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general
circulation published in the city or village where the community
improvement district was organized, which publication shall contain the
entire wording of the proposed resolution. The trustees or administrator
shall mail a copy of such proposed resolution to any city or village in
which any part of the community improvement district is located within
five days after the date of first publication of the resolution. The last
publication shall be not less than five days nor more than two weeks
-42-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
prior to the time set for hearing on objections to the passage of the
resolution, at which hearing the owners of property within the community
improvement district, or any city or village in which any part of the
community improvement district is located, may appear and make objections
to the proposed resolution.
(2) If (a) a petition opposing the proposed resolution of
dissolution is signed by property owners representing a majority of the
area of real estate within the community improvement district or (b) a
resolution is adopted by the city council or village board of trustees
opposing such dissolution and either is presented to the board of
trustees or the administrator on or prior to the hearing date, then the
board of trustees or the administrator shall not adopt such resolution.
(3) If the owners representing a majority of the area of real estate
within the community improvement district fail to sign and present to the
board or to the administrator, on or prior to the hearing date, a written
petition opposing the proposed resolution of dissolution, or if a
resolution opposing such dissolution is not adopted by the village board
of trustees or city council, then a majority of the board of trustees or
the administrator may pass the resolution and thereby adopt the proposed
dissolution. After the board of trustees or the administrator has adopted
such resolution of dissolution, the clerk of the community improvement
district shall prepare and file a certified copy of the resolution of
dissolution in the office of the city or village clerk where the original
articles of association were filed and in the office of the Secretary of
State.
(4) A proposed resolution of dissolution shall not be adopted if the
community improvement district is obligated on any outstanding bonds,
warrants, or other debts or obligations unless the holders of such bonds,
warrants, or other debts or obligations shall all sign written consents
to the dissolution prior to the adoption of the resolution of
dissolution.
-43-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
Sec. 39. (1) Whenever a majority of the respective boards of
trustees or the administrators of two community improvement districts
organized under the Community Improvement District Act, organized within
the same city or village shall desire that one of the community
improvement districts shall wholly merge into the other community
improvement district, the trustees or administrators shall first propose
a joint resolution declaring the advisability of such merger and setting
out verbatim the terms and conditions thereof and specifying which
community improvement district shall be the surviving community
improvement district, and also setting out the time and place when the
boards of trustees or administrators of the two community improvement
districts shall meet to consider the adoption of such resolution. Notice
of the time and place when the two community improvement districts shall
meet shall be delivered to the city or village clerk and the county
clerk, election commissioner, and register of deeds of each county or
counties in which the community improvement district is located at least
forty-five days prior to such date.
(2) The trustees or the administrators shall mail a copy of such
proposed joint resolution to the city or village clerk within five days
after the date of first publication of the published notice described in
this section. Notice of the time and place when such resolution shall be
set for consideration shall be published the same day each week for two
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
city or village where the community improvement districts were organized,
which publication shall contain the entire wording of the proposed
resolution. The last publication shall be not less than five days nor
more than two weeks prior to the time set for hearing on objections to
the passage of the resolution, at which hearing the owners of property
within either of the community improvement districts or the holders of
any unpaid bonds, warrants, or other obligations of either community
improvement district, or any city or village if any part of such
-44-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
community improvement district or community improvement districts lies
within the area of its zoning jurisdiction, may appear and make
objections to the proposed resolution.
(3) If (a) a petition opposing the proposed resolution of merger is
signed by (i) property owners representing a majority of the area of real
estate within either community improvement district or (ii) any holder of
any unpaid bonds, warrants, or other obligations of either community
improvement district or (b) a resolution is adopted by the city council
or village board of trustees opposing such resolution of merger and if
any such petition or resolution is presented to the boards of trustees or
administrators on or prior to the hearing date, then the boards of
trustees or administrators shall not adopt such resolution.
(4) If a written petition or resolution opposing the proposed
resolution of merger is not filed, then a majority of the boards of
trustees or administrators of both community improvement districts may
pass the resolution and thereby adopt the proposed merger. Upon adoption
of the proposed resolution by the boards of trustees or administrators of
both community improvement districts, the clerk of the community
improvement district or the administrator from both community improvement
districts shall prepare and file a certified copy of such resolution of
merger in the office of the city or village clerk where the original
articles of association of the community improvement districts were filed
and in the office of the Secretary of State, and thereupon the surviving
community improvement district shall succeed to and become vested with
full title to all the property and property rights of every kind,
contracts, obligations, and choses in action of every kind held by or
belonging to the nonsurviving community improvement district, and the
surviving community improvement district shall also be liable for and
recognize, assume, and carry out all valid contracts and obligations of
the nonsurviving community improvement district including all outstanding
warrants, bonds, or other indebtedness. All taxes, assessments, and
-45-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
demands of every kind due or owing to the nonsurviving community
improvement district shall be paid to and collected by the surviving
community improvement district.
(5) Upon the filing of the certified copies of the resolution of
merger as provided in this section, the corporate existence of the
nonsurviving community improvement district shall thereupon terminate and
the boundaries of the surviving community improvement district shall be
extended to include all the territory within the boundaries of the
nonsurviving community improvement district. A majority of the board of
trustees or the administrator of the surviving community improvement
district shall have power, from time to time, to give binding directions
in writing to the county treasurer of the county in which the surviving
community improvement district is located, directing that the treasurer
segregate the special assessment funds of the two community improvement
districts or directing the segregation of the other assets of the two
community improvement districts or directing the method and priority of
payment of registered warrants of the two community improvement
districts, or giving directions to the county treasurer as to other
problems of fiscal management of the affairs of the two community
improvement districts involved in the merger.
Sec. 40. (1) Whenever a majority of the board of trustees or the
administrator of any community improvement district organized under the
Community Improvement District Act, desires that any property within the
community improvement district be detached from the community improvement
district, the trustees or the administrator shall first propose a
resolution declaring the advisability of such detachment and setting out
verbatim the terms and conditions thereof and also setting out the time
and place when the board of trustees or the administrator will meet to
consider the adoption of such resolution. Notice of the time and place
when the resolution shall be set for consideration shall be delivered to
the city or village clerk and the county clerk, election commissioner,
-46-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
and register of deeds of each county or counties in which the community
improvement district is located at least forty-five days prior to such
date. Notice of the time and place when the resolution shall be set for
consideration shall be published the same day each week for two
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
city or village where the community improvement district was organized,
which publication shall contain the entire wording of the proposed
resolution. The trustees or administrator shall mail a copy of such
proposed resolution to the city or village clerk of the city or village
in which any part of the community improvement district is located within
five days after the date of first publication of the resolution. The last
publication shall be not less than five days nor more than two weeks
prior to the time set for hearing on objections to the passage of the
resolution, at which hearing the owners of property within the community
improvement district, or any city or village in which any part of the
community improvement district is located, may appear and make objections
to the proposed resolution.
(2) If (a) a petition opposing the proposed resolution of detachment
is signed by property owners representing a majority of the area of real
estate within the community improvement district or (b) a resolution is
adopted by the city council or village board of trustees opposing the
proposed resolution of detachment and such petition or resolution is
presented to the board of trustees or to the administrator on or prior to
the hearing date, then the board of trustees or the administrator shall
not adopt such resolution.
(3) If the owners representing a majority of the area of real estate
within the community improvement district fail to sign and present to the
board of trustees or the administrator, on or prior to the hearing date,
a written petition opposing the proposed resolution of detachment, or if
the city council or village board of trustees fail to adopt a resolution
opposing such resolution of detachment, then a majority of the board of
-47-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
trustees or the administrator may pass the resolution and thereby adopt
the proposed detachment. After the board of trustees or the administrator
has adopted such resolution of detachment, the clerk of the community
improvement district shall prepare and file a certified copy of the
resolution of detachment in the office of the city clerk where the
original articles of association were filed and in the office of the
Secretary of State, and thereupon the area detached shall become excluded
and detached from the boundaries of the community improvement district.
(4) A resolution of detachment proposed under this section shall not
be adopted if the community improvement district is indebted on any
outstanding bonds or warrants of the community improvement district
unless the holders of such bonds and warrants all sign written consents
to the detachment prior to the adoption of the resolution of detachment.
Sec. 41. When any land is a part of two community improvement
districts and the owners of such land desire that it be a part of only
one community improvement district, such owners shall file their request
with the trustees or the administrator of each community improvement
district. The trustees or the administrator of the community improvement
districts shall meet jointly and develop an agreement for the detachment
of the land from one of the community improvement districts and the
adjustment of indebtedness. If the trustees or administrators are unable
to reach an agreement, they shall file a petition in the district court
of the county in which such land is located and the court shall have
jurisdiction to detach the land and adjust the indebtedness. The clerk of
the community improvement district shall notify the clerk of each city or
village in which the community improvement districts are located and the
county clerk, election commissioner, and register of deeds of each county
or counties in which the community improvement districts are located of
the agreement for detachment or the filing of the petition in district
court.
Sec. 42. A petition may be filed with the district court of the
-48-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
county in which a majority of the real property of a community
improvement district is located for referral of the community improvement
district to the Auditor of Public Accounts for the appointment of an
administrator of the community improvement district and suspension of the
authority of the board of trustees or other relief as provided by
sections 43 to 51 of this act. Such petition may be filed by: (1) A
majority of the board of trustees of the community improvement district;
(2) the holders of more than fifty percent in principal amount of the
outstanding bonds of the community improvement district; (3) the holders
of more than fifty percent in principal amount of outstanding
construction fund warrants of the community improvement district; (4) a
majority of the lessees permitted to vote pursuant to section 14 of this
act who are residents of the community improvement district and resident
property owners of the community improvement district; (5) the owners of
more than one-half of the real property within the community improvement
district; or (6) a city or village in which the community improvement
district is located and which exercises zoning jurisdiction over the
community improvement district. A petition filed by a city or village
pursuant to subdivision (6) of this section may be filed only on grounds
that the community improvement district has issued outstanding bonds or
construction fund warrants which have been in default for more than
ninety days or the community improvement district lacks a functioning
board of trustees.
Sec. 43. The court shall fix the time for the hearing of the
petition pursuant to section 42 of this act and shall order the clerk of
the court to give and publish a notice of the filing of the petition. The
notice shall be given by publication the same day of the week each week
for three consecutive weeks. Within five days after the first publication
of such notice, the petitioner shall cause to be mailed by United States
mail a copy of such notice to each holder of outstanding warrants and
bonds, to each member of the board of trustees if the board has not
-49-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
petitioned for the appointment, to the city or village in which the
community improvement district is located, and to each person whose
property ownership is of record on the records of the register of deeds
at least thirty days and not more than forty days prior to the mailing of
a notice. Notice shall be sent to each bond and warrant holder, trustee,
and property owner whose name and post office address are known after
diligent investigation and inquiry. The notice shall state the time and
place fixed for the hearing of the petition and the prayer of the
petition, and that any person with an interest in the community
improvement district may, on or before the day fixed for the hearing of
the petition, move to join in, dismiss, or answer the petition. The
petition may be referred to and described in the notice as the petition
of ................. (giving name of petitioner) praying for the referral
of the community improvement district to the Auditor of Public Accounts
for the appointment of an administrator of the community improvement
district and the suspension of the authority of the board of trustees of
such community improvement district to exercise the powers granted the
board of trustees under the Community Improvement District Act during the
period of such administrator's appointment.
Sec. 44. The petition shall state that the community improvement
district (1) has been in default for more than ninety days on its issued
and outstanding bonds or construction fund warrants of the community
improvement district, (2) has levied a tax upon the taxable value of the
taxable property in the community improvement district which, along with
the sinking fund derived from special assessments, has not been
sufficient to meet payments of interest and principal on the issued and
outstanding bonds of the community improvement district, (3) has failed
to levy special assessments on all lots, parcels, or pieces of real
property within the terms provided in section 32 of this act, or (4)
lacks a functioning board of trustees. The petition shall pray for
referral of the community improvement district to the Auditor of Public
-50-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
Accounts for the appointment of an administrator for the community
improvement district and for an order suspending the authority of the
board of trustees of the community improvement district to exercise the
powers granted to such board pursuant to the Community Improvement
District Act during the period of such administrator's appointment or for
such other relief as the court may determine appropriate.
Sec. 45. Any person with an interest in the community improvement
district may join in the petition, move to dismiss the petition, or file
an answer to such petition. The rules of civil procedure relating to
motions and answers to a petition shall be applicable to motions and
answers to the petition in such special proceedings. The persons filing
motions to dismiss and answering the petition shall be the defendants to
the special proceedings, and the persons filing the petition or joining
in the petition shall be the plaintiffs. Every material statement of the
petition not specially controverted by the answer shall, for the purpose
of the special proceedings, be taken as true. Each person or party in
interest failing to answer the petition shall be deemed to admit as true
all the material statements of the petition. The rules of civil procedure
relating to pleading and practice which are not inconsistent with the
provisions of the Community Improvement District Act are applicable to
the special proceedings in sections 42 to 47 of this act.
Sec. 46. Upon the hearing of the special proceedings pursuant to
sections 42 to 47 of this act, the court shall, upon a finding that any
of the statements in subdivisions (1) through (4) of section 44 of this
act are true, that the petition has been properly filed and notice of the
petition has been duly given and published for the time and in the manner
prescribed in sections 42 to 47 of this act, and that it is in the best
interest of the community improvement district, have the power and
jurisdiction to issue an order which refers the community improvement
district to the Auditor of Public Accounts for appointment by the auditor
of an administrator from a list of not less than two names of persons
-51-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
possessing real estate and financial expertise compiled by the court in
the proceedings, and which provides for the suspension of the authority
of the board of trustees of the community improvement district to
exercise the powers granted such board under the Community Improvement
District Act during the period of such administrator's appointment. In
the alternative or as additional relief, the court may order such other
relief as may be appropriate to cure the defects of the community
improvement district, including, but not limited to, (1) appointment of
trustees to serve until the next regular election, (2) calling a special
election to elect trustees which shall be conducted in the same manner as
other elections for trustees, and (3) directing the board of trustees to
levy taxes or special assessments as required by the Community
Improvement District Act. The cost of the special proceedings may be
allowed and apportioned between the parties in the discretion of the
court.
Sec. 47. Upon receipt of the order of the district court referring
the community improvement district to the Auditor of Public Accounts for
the appointment of an administrator, the auditor shall appoint an
administrator with authority, including all authority of the board of
trustees, chairperson, and clerk of the community improvement district,
to direct the affairs of the community improvement district pursuant to
the Community Improvement District Act unless the auditor shall determine
upon good cause that the appointment of an administrator would not be in
the best interests of the community improvement district. Within sixty
days after receipt of such order of the district court, the auditor shall
file with the court a certificate evidencing compliance with this section
and if the auditor determines not to appoint an administrator, such
certificate shall specify the grounds for the auditor's determination
that the appointment would not be in the best interest of the community
improvement district.
Sec. 48. Upon the issuance of a certificate of appointment by the
-52-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
Auditor of Public Accounts to a designated community improvement district
administrator, the authority of the board of trustees of the community
improvement district to exercise the powers of the community improvement
district conferred by the Community Improvement District Act shall be
suspended. The administrator shall during the period of his or her
appointment possess all of the powers of the board of trustees and shall
possess exclusive authority to exercise the powers conferred in the
Community Improvement District Act.
Sec. 49. The board of trustees or the administrator shall have the
power to negotiate a scaling, a discounting, a reduction in interest
rate, or any other compromise of any or all of the bonds, warrants, or
other indebtedness of the community improvement district with the owners
or holders of such indebtedness. In order to carry out any compromise
agreements made, the board of trustees or the administrator shall have
the power to issue new bonds or warrants which may be delivered to the
holders or owners of the indebtedness being compromised or may be sold on
such terms as the board of trustees or administrator shall determine to
provide cash to carry out the compromise settlement. Before any new bonds
or warrants are issued, the terms of the compromise settlement shall be
approved by the district court for the county in which the community
improvement district or the greater portion of the community improvement
district is situated. Such review by the district court shall be limited
to the legality and validity of the new bonds or warrants to be issued,
and the decree of the district court determining the issuance of the new
bonds or warrants to be legal and valid shall be conclusive against the
community improvement district and all other persons having or claiming
any interest in the community improvement district. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the treasurer of the community improvement
district shall disburse funds of the community improvement district in
accordance with the compromise settlement approved by the district court.
Sec. 50. (1) The administrator may levy a separate tax upon the
-53-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
taxable value of the taxable property in the community improvement
district which shall be known as the administration tax and which shall
be separately accounted for by the treasurer of the community improvement
district. Such tax shall be paid annually. Such tax may be used to pay
the fees and expenses of the administrator and his or her administration,
including the cost of audit services, legal services, and financial
advisory services ordered by the administrator.
(2) The administrator shall receive a minimum fee of five hundred
dollars per month during the term of his or her appointment. The
administrator shall also be entitled to reimbursement for his or her
actual and necessary expenses upon presentation of an accounting of his
or her expenses to the Auditor of Public Accounts. The monthly
administrator's fee provided for in this subsection shall be subject to
adjustment at any time during the term of the administrator's appointment
by the Auditor of Public Accounts. The factors to be considered by the
auditor in his or her determination to increase the administrator's fee
shall include the nature and extent of the administrator's services, the
complexity of the problems confronting the community improvement
district, and the value of the services of the administrator to the
community improvement district. The auditor shall also consider the cost
of obtaining comparable services of the administrator in the private
sector.
Sec. 51. The administrator shall serve at the pleasure of the
Auditor of Public Accounts or until the district court shall terminate
the authority of the auditor and the administrator. A petition for review
by the court of the original order may be filed by any person with an
interest in the community improvement district. The court shall have the
power to terminate the authority of the Auditor of Public Accounts and
the administrator upon its determination that none of the conditions set
forth in section 44 of this act exist or it is in the best interest of
the community improvement district that the authority of the
-54-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
administrator be terminated. A termination of the authority of the
Auditor of Public Accounts and the administrator shall reinstate the
authority of the board of trustees pursuant to the Community Improvement
District Act.
Sec. 52. For purposes of sections 52 to 59 of this act:
(1) Filing clerk means the election commissioner or county clerk of
the county in which all or the largest portion of the land area
comprising a community improvement district is located;
(2) Qualified property owning voter means a person entitled to vote
as provided in section 14 of this act for all trustees of a community
improvement district other than those which may be elected only by
qualified resident voters; and
(3) Qualified resident voter means a person entitled to vote as
provided in section 14 of this act for all trustees of a community
improvement district.
Sec. 53. (1) A trustee of a community improvement district may be
removed from office by recall pursuant to sections 52 to 59 of this act.
A petition for an election to recall a trustee shall be sufficient if it
complies with the requirements of this section.
(2) The signers of the petition shall be persons who were, on the
date the initial petition papers are issued under subsection (7) of this
section, eligible to vote in a community improvement district election as
provided in section 14 of this act. A person's eligibility to sign a
petition shall be the same as the person's eligibility to cast one or
more votes at a community improvement district election under section 14
of this act. Only one person shall be allowed to sign on behalf of joint
owners of property in the community improvement district or on behalf of
a public, private, or municipal corporation that owns property in the
community improvement district. If the trustee whose recall is sought was
elected by vote of resident owners only, then only resident owners shall
be allowed to sign the petition. If the trustee whose recall is sought
-55-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
was elected by vote of all owners of property, then all owners shall be
allowed to sign the petition. For purposes of this section, resident
owner means qualified resident voter and all owners means all qualified
resident voters and all qualified property owning voters.
(3) The filing clerk shall assign to each signature a count equal to
the number of votes that the signer was eligible to cast on the date he
or she signed. The number of votes that a signer was eligible to cast
shall be based on section 14 of this act. If the signature was made by or
for an owner of more than one parcel of property, the signature made by
or on behalf of such owner shall be assigned a count equal to the total
number of votes which the owner was eligible to cast.
(4) The filing clerk shall total the count assigned to the
signatures on the petition. The petition shall be sufficient if the total
is at least equal to thirty-five percent of the highest number of votes
that were cast for a candidate at the previous community improvement
district election for the trustee positions in the same category as the
trustee whose recall is sought by the petition. The categories of
trustees shall be the same as provided in section 14 of this act.
(5) The signatures shall be affixed to petition papers and shall be
considered part of the petition.
(6) The petition papers shall be procured from the filing clerk.
Prior to the issuance of such petition papers, a recall petition filing
form shall be signed and filed with the filing clerk by (a) at least one
qualified resident voter of the district if the trustee whose recall is
being sought was elected solely by qualified resident voters or (b) at
least one qualified resident voter or qualified property owning voter if
the trustee whose recall is being sought was elected by qualified
resident voters and qualified property owning voters. Such voter or
voters shall be deemed to be the principal circulator or circulators of
the recall petition. The filing form shall state the name of the trustee
sought to be removed and whether qualified property owning voters
-56-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
participated in the election of the trustee and shall request that the
filing clerk issue initial petition papers to the principal circulator
for circulation. The filing clerk shall notify the principal circulator
or circulators that the necessary signatures must be gathered within
thirty days after the date of issuing the petitions.
(7) The filing clerk, upon issuing the initial petition papers or
any subsequent petition papers, shall enter in a record, to be kept in
his or her office, the name of the principal circulator or circulators to
whom the papers were issued, the date of issuance, the number of papers
issued, and whether qualified property owning voters may participate in
signing the petitions. The filing clerk shall certify on the papers the
name of the principal circulator or circulators to whom the papers were
issued, the date they were issued, and whether qualified property owning
voters may participate in signing the petitions. No petition paper shall
be accepted as part of the petition unless it bears such certificate. The
principal circulator or circulators who check out petitions from the
filing clerk may distribute such petitions to persons who may act as
circulators of such petitions.
Sec. 54. (1) The Secretary of State shall design the uniform
petition papers to be distributed by all filing clerks for use in the
recall of trustees of community improvement districts and shall keep a
sufficient number of such blank petition papers on file for distribution
to any filing clerk requesting recall petitions.
(2) Each petition paper presented to a qualified voter for his or
her signature shall clearly indicate at the top (a) whether the trustee
whose recall is being sought was elected solely by qualified resident
voters, (b) whether the signatories must be qualified resident voters or
may include qualified property owning voters, (c) that the signatories
must support the holding of a recall election for the trustee, (d) the
name of the individual sought to be recalled, and (e) a general statement
of the reason or reasons for which recall is sought.
-57-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
(3) Each petition paper shall contain a statement, entitled
Instructions to Petition Circulators, prepared by the Secretary of State
to assist circulators in understanding the provisions governing the
petition process established by sections 52 to 59 of this act. The
instructions shall include the following statement: No one circulating
this petition paper in an attempt to gather signatures shall sign the
circulator's affidavit unless each person who signed the petition paper
did so in the presence of the circulator.
Sec. 55. (1) The principal circulator or circulators shall file, as
one instrument, all petition papers comprising a recall petition for
signature verification with the filing clerk within thirty days after the
filing clerk issues the initial petition papers to the principal
circulator or circulators as provided in section 53 of this act.
(2) Within fifteen days after the filing of the petition, the filing
clerk shall ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by sufficient
qualified resident voters and qualified property owning voters as
provided in section 53 of this act. No new signatures may be added after
the initial filing of the petition papers. No signatures may be removed
unless the filing clerk receives an affidavit signed by the person
requesting that his or her signature be removed before the petitions are
filed with the filing clerk for signature verification.
(3) If the petition is found to be sufficient, the filing clerk
shall attach to the petition a certificate showing the result of such
examination. If the petition is found not to be sufficient, the filing
clerk shall file the petition in his or her office without prejudice to
the filing of a new petition for the same purpose.
Sec. 56. (1) If the recall petition is found to be sufficient, the
filing clerk shall notify the trustee whose removal is sought and the
board of trustees of the community improvement district that sufficient
signatures have been gathered.
(2) If the trustee does not resign within five days after receiving
-58-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
the notice, the filing clerk shall order an election to be held not less
than forty-five days nor more than sixty days after the expiration of the
five-day period, except that if an election for the board of trustees of
the community improvement district is to be held within one hundred
twenty days after the expiration of the five-day period, the filing clerk
shall provide for the holding of the removal election at the time of such
regular election. The recall election shall be conducted in the same
manner as an election for members of the board of trustees as provided in
section 14 of this act. After the filing clerk sets the date for the
recall election, the recall election shall be held regardless of whether
the trustee whose removal is sought resigns before the recall election is
held.
Sec. 57. The form of the official ballot at a recall election
conducted pursuant to section 56 of this act shall conform to the
requirements of this section. With respect to each trustee whose removal
is sought, the question shall be submitted: Shall (name of trustee) be
removed from the office of trustee? Immediately following each such
question there shall be printed on the ballot the two responses: Yes and
No. Immediately to the left of each response shall be placed a square or
oval in which the voters qualified to vote for the trustee in a regular
election may vote for one of the responses by making a cross or other
clear, identifiable mark. The name of the trustee which shall appear on
the ballot shall be the name of the trustee that appeared on the ballot
of the previous election that included his or her name.
Sec. 58. (1) If a majority of the votes cast at a recall election
are against the removal of the trustee named on the ballot or the
election results in a tie, the trustee shall continue in office for the
remainder of his or her term.
(2) If a majority of the votes cast at a recall election are for the
removal of the trustee named on the ballot, he or she shall, regardless
of any technical defects in the recall petition, be deemed removed from
-59-

LB1130 LB1130
2026 2026
office unless a recount is ordered. If the trustee is deemed removed, the
removal shall result in an immediate vacancy in the office from the date
of the election. The vacancy shall be filled as provided in subsection
(2) of section 14 of this act.
(3) If there are vacancies in the offices of a majority or more of
the members of the board of trustees at one time due to the recall of
such members, a special election to fill such vacancies shall be
conducted as expeditiously as possible by the filing clerk in the manner
specified in section 14 of this act.
(4) No trustee who is removed at a recall election or who resigns
after the initiation of the recall process shall be appointed to fill the
vacancy resulting from his or her removal or the removal of any other
member of the same board of trustees during the remainder of his or her
term of office.
Sec. 59. No recall petition filing form shall be filed against a
trustee under section 53 of this act within twelve months after a recall
election has failed to remove him or her from office, within six months
after the beginning of his or her term of office, or within six months
prior to the incumbent filing deadline for the office.
Sec. 60. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-60-